Hawaii statutes.
[ARTICLE
14G]

HEALTH INSURANCE RATE REGULATION

[§431:14G-101]
Scope and purpose. (a) This
article shall apply to all types of health insurance offered by managed care
plans.

(b) The
purpose of this article is to promote the public welfare by regulating health
insurance rates to the end that they shall not be excessive, inadequate,
or unfairly discriminatory. Nothing in this article is intended to:

(1) Prohibit or
discourage reasonable competition; or

(2) Prohibit or encourage,
except to the extent necessary to accomplish the aforementioned purposes,
uniformity in insurance rates, rating systems, rating plans, or practices.

This article
shall be liberally interpreted to carry into effect this section. [L 2007, c
175, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next